South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Uniform Requirements for Interscholastic Activity Participation Act." SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-63-97.  (A) Definitions. For purposes of this section: (1) "Interscholastic activities" means any school-sponsored program in which students participate competitively or represent the school in events against other schools including, but not limited to: (a) athletics, including football, basketball, baseball, soccer, and cheerleading; (b) performing arts, including band, chorus, orchestra, and theater; (c) academic competitions, including debate, robotics, science Olympiad, and math teams; and (d) other school-sponsored clubs or teams participating in competitions or events against students from other schools. (2) "Core academic classes" means courses required for graduation under state or district academic standards, including mathematics, English language arts, science, social studies, and required foreign languages. (B)(1) Students shall not be excused from core academic classes for participation in interscholastic activities, including practices, games, or competitions against other schools, except when such participation is unavoidable and occurs under circumstances that are extraordinary and documented in writing by the school principal. (2) School schedules shall prioritize instructional time; participation in interscholastic activities shall not result in reduced or compromised academic instruction. (C)(1) School instructional budgets shall not be used to fund interscholastic activities, except for salaries of coaches or sponsors who are also classroom teachers providing instruction during the school day. (2) All other costs associated with interscholastic activities including, but not limited to, equipment, uniforms, travel, meals, lodging, and event fees, shall be funded through fundraising, sponsorships, fees from participating students, or work-based arrangements consistent with other extracurricular programs. (3) Families of students participating in interscholastic activities shall contribute to the costs of participation on the same basis as families of students participating in other extracurricular programs. (D)(1) To participate in interscholastic activities, students in grades nine through twelve must maintain a minimum 2.5 unweighted grade point average in all core academic classes: (a) in the semester preceding participation in the interscholastic activity, if the interscholastic activity occurs completely within one semester; or (b) in the semester preceding the first semester of participation in an interscholastic activity if the interscholastic activity occurs over two consecutive semesters. (2) Academic work, assignments, and grades for student participants shall be reviewed and verified by personnel completely independent of the interscholastic activity program, free from influence or pressure from coaches, sponsors, or school administrators involved in the activity. (E)(1) Each school district shall adopt policies consistent with this section and ensure compliance through regular audits and reporting. (2) Violations of this section shall result in administrative review and appropriate corrective actions, including temporary suspension of interscholastic activities funding or participation privileges until compliance is achieved. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and is applicable beginning with the 2027-2028 School Year. ----XX----